Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.360

Personal injury action—Complaint not to include statement of damages—Request for statement.

In any civil action for personal injuries, the complaint shall not contain a statement of the damages sought but shall contain a prayer for damages as shall be determined. A defendant in such action may at any time request a statement from the plaintiff setting forth separately the amounts of any special damages and general damages sought. Not later than fifteen days after service of such request to the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall have served the defendant with such statement.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 4.16.350.

Actions and procedure for injuries resulting from health care: Chapter 7.70 RCW.

Verdict or award of future economic damages in personal injury or property damage action may provide for periodic payments: RCW 4.56.260.